Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202543-260.01
Detention; factors.

The need for preadjudication placement, services, or supervision and the need for detention of a juvenile and whether detention or an alternative to detention is indicated shall be subject to subdivision (5) of section 43-251.01 and shall be determined as follows:

(1) The standardized juvenile detention screening instrument shall be used to evaluate the juvenile;

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of section 43-250, if the results indicate that detention is not required, the juvenile shall be released without restriction or released to an alternative to detention; and

(3) If the results indicate that detention is required, detention shall be pursued.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 13;

Laws 2016, LB894, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB670, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB530, § 15.